District of Columbia statutes.
38-1414

Grants from Secretary of Education — Regulations.

For the purposes of § 38-1412 and § 38-1416, regulations of the Secretary shall include provisions relating to the determination of the number of students enrolled in a school, or in a particular year-class in a school, as the case may be, on the basis of estimates, or on the basis of the number of students who were enrolled in a school, or in a particular year-class, as the case may be, in an earlier year, or on such basis as he deems appropriate for making such determinations.

History

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1934, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 305

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1714.
1973 Ed., § 31-924.